Delaware, session 153, SB2.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE (Two-thirds of all members elected to each house thereof concurring therein): Section 1. Amend Â§ 1, Article V of the Delaware Constitution by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 1. Time and manner of holding general election. (a) The general election shall be held biennially on the Tuesday next after the first Monday in the month of November, November and shall be by ballot; but the General Assembly may by law prescribe the means, methods, and instruments of voting so as best to secure secrecy and the independence of the voter, preserve the freedom and purity of elections, and prevent fraud, corruption, and intimidation thereat. (b) Early, in-person voting must occur on 10 calendar days before the date established for each of the following elections, including on the Saturday and Sunday immediately before the following elections: (1) The general election under subsection (a) of this Section. (2) A primary election for an office to be decided at the general election under subsection (a) of this Section. (3) A special election which fills a vacancy in the General Assembly.